North Carolina, session 2025, SB451.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. REDUCTION OF CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS FOR
CERTAIN BOARDS THAT ARE SET BY RULE
SECTION 1.1.(a) Reduction of Continuing Education Requirements. –
Notwithstanding any other provision of law or rule, covered boards shall reduce the continuing
education and professional development hour requirements established by the covered boards'
respective rules by fifty percent (50%).
SECTION 1.1.(b) Implementation. – The boards listed in subsection (d) of this
section shall implement this reduction by either (i) reducing continuing education rules per
renewal cycle by fifty percent (50%) or (ii) keeping the same number of hours required by
continuing education rules as of the effective date of this act and doubling the time allowed to
achieve those credit hours.
SECTION 1.1.(c) Applicability. – If the reduction of continuing education rules
would invalidate an accreditation, Interstate Compact, or federal law or rule for a type of license,
certification, or permit of a covered board, then the requirement to reduce the continuing
education rules for that specific license is suspended. The covered board shall submit a report to
the Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee by October 1, 2025,
indicating the invalidation or conflict under this section and a proposed legislative
recommendation to reduce the requirements of continuing education rules to the maximum extent
allowed without invalidating the licensure, certification, or permit.
SECTION 1.1.(d) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Continuing education rules. – Any rule adopted by a covered board that sets
an amount of hours for professional training, professional development,
continuing education, continuing legal education, continuing medical
education, or other training required for a renewal of licensure, certification,
or permit for a licensee of a covered board.
(2) Covered board. – All of the following boards that set continuing education
requirements by rule:
a. North Carolina Board of Landscape Architects.
b. North Carolina Board for Licensing of Soil Scientists.
c. North Carolina State Board of Examiners for Engineers and
Surveyors.
*S451-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. North Carolina Board for Licensing of Geologists.
e. North Carolina Board of Athletic Trainer Examiners.
f. North Carolina Locksmith Licensing Board.
g. North Carolina Board of Environmental Health Specialist Examiners.
h. North Carolina Pesticide Board.
i. North Carolina Appraisal Board.
j. The North Carolina Interpreter and Transliterator Licensing Board, in
addition to the requirements under Section 2.16 of this act.

PART II. REDUCTION IN CONTINUING EDUCATION OR PROFESSIONAL
DEVELOPMENT HOURS SPECIFIED BY STATUTE
SECTION 2.1.(a) North Carolina Licensing Board for General Contractors. –
G.S. 87-10.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-10.2. Continuing education.
(a) As a condition of license renewal, at least one qualifier or qualifying party of a
licensee holding a building contractor, residential contractor, or unclassified contractor license
classification shall complete, on an annual basis, eight hours as determined by the Board pursuant
to subsection (b1) of this section, either (i) on an annual basis, five hours or (ii) on a biennial
basis, 10 hours of continuing education approved in accordance with this section. Where an entity
holding a building contractor, residential contractor, or unclassified contractor license
classification has multiple qualifiers or qualifying parties, at least one qualifier or qualifying
party of the licensee shall complete this requirement for the license to remain valid.
(b) Of the eight hours of annual When completing annual continuing education, of the
five hours of continuing education required by this section, two hours shall be a mandatory course
approved by the Board and the remaining six three hours shall be elective courses approved by
the Board. When completing biennial continuing education, of the 10 hours required, four hours
shall be a mandatory course approved by the Board and the remaining six hours shall be elective
courses approved by the Board. Each qualifier or qualifying party shall complete the mandatory
course each year or compliance period, as applicable. Each qualifier or qualifying party may
accumulate and carry forward up to four two hours of elective course credit to the next calendar
year. or compliance period, as applicable. The Board shall evaluate and approve:
(1) The content of continuing education courses.
(2) Accreditation of continuing education sponsors and programs.
(3) Computation of credit.
(4) General compliance procedures.
(5) Providers and instructors of continuing education courses.
(b1) The Board shall determine whether continuing education requirements shall be
completed on an annual or biennial basis and shall notify licensees of the selected compliance
period no less than 90 days before the start of the applicable compliance period.
…
(g) Continuing education requirements shall begin on January 1 of any calendar year and
shall be completed by November 30 of that calendar year or, for biennial compliance periods, by
November 30 of the second year of the compliance period. The Board shall establish a 90-day
grace period following November 30 of each calendar year the compliance period for any
qualifier or qualifying party who has failed to complete the continuing education requirement.
Failure of the qualifier or qualifying party of the entity holding a building contractor, residential
contractor, or unclassified contractor license classification to satisfy the annual continuing
education requirement by the expiration of the grace period shall result in the license of the entity
being invalidated until such time that continuing education and all other licensing requirements
have been met.
Page 2 Senate Bill 451-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(h) Any licensee who chooses not to complete the annual continuing education as
required by this section may annually request that the Board place the licensee's license in an
inactive status and the license shall become invalid for that license year. period. However, in
order for the license to be maintained as inactive, the licensee shall pay the same annual renewal
fee paid by active licensees. Should the licensee desire to return to active status, the qualifier or
qualifying party of the licensee shall satisfactorily complete the following continuing education
requirements prior to seeking reinstatement:
(1) If the licensee seeks reinstatement during the first two years after the license
becomes inactive, the qualifier or qualifying party shall complete eight five
hours for annual compliance periods or 10 hours for biennial compliance
periods of continuing education, including the mandatory course offered
during the year period of reinstatement.
(2) If the licensee seeks reinstatement more than two years after the license
becomes inactive, the qualifier or qualifying party shall complete 16 eight
hours for annual compliance periods or 16 hours for biennial compliance
periods of continuing education, including the mandatory course offered
during the year period of reinstatement.
…."
SECTION 2.1.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Licensing Board for General
Contractors shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.2.(a) North Carolina Landscape Contractors' Licensing Board. –
G.S. 89D-20 reads as rewritten:
"§ 89D-20. License renewal and continuing education.
…
(b) As a condition of license renewal, a licensee shall meet the continuing education
requirements set under either one of the following options as determined by the Board. Each
licensee shall complete seven continuing education units per year. Board:
(1) Option 1: Annual requirement. – Each licensee shall complete three and
one-half continuing education units per year.
(2) Option 2: Biennial requirement. – Each licensee shall complete seven
continuing education units over a two-year period. For annual license
renewals that occur during this two-year continuing education cycle, the
Board shall do both of the following:
a. At the first annual renewal, verify that the licensee is making
satisfactory progress toward meeting the biennial requirement.
b. At the second annual renewal, verify that the licensee has completed
the full biennial requirement.
(c) The Board shall notify licensees of the selected continuing education option provided
by subsection (b) of this section no less than 90 days before the start of the applicable continuing
education cycle.
(d) The Board may suspend a licensee's license for 30 days for failure to obtain
continuing education units required by this subsection. section. Upon payment of a reinstatement
fee, submission to the Board of proof of the continuing education units required by this
subsection, and payment of the license renewal fee and late renewal fee, the licensee's license
shall be reinstated. Failure to request a reinstatement of the license and failure to pay the
reinstatement fee, renewal fee, and late renewal fee shall result in the forfeiture of a license. Upon
forfeiture, a person shall be required to submit a new application and retake the examination as
provided in this Chapter."
SECTION 2.2.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Landscape Contractors'
Licensing Board shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
Senate Bill 451-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.3.(a) North Carolina Irrigation Contractors' Licensing Board. –
G.S. 89G-9 reads as rewritten:
"§ 89G-9. License renewal and continuing education.
…
(b) As a condition of license renewal, an individual licensee shall meet continuing
education requirements set by the Board. Each individual licensee shall complete 10 continuing
education units per year.An individual licensee shall meet continuing education requirements
under one of the following options as determined by the Board:
(1) Option 1: Annual requirement. – Each individual licensee shall complete five
continuing education units per year.
(2) Option 2: Biennial requirement. – Each individual licensee shall complete 10
continuing education units over a two-year period. For annal license renewals
that occur during this two-year continuing education cycle, the Board shall do
both of the following:
a. At the first annual renewal, verify that the licensee is making
satisfactory progress toward meeting the biennial requirement.
b. At the second annual renewal, verify that the licensee has completed
the full biennial requirement.
(b1) The Board shall determine which continuing education option provided by subsection
(b) of this section shall be implemented and shall notify licensees of the selected option no less
than 90 days before the start of the applicable compliance period.
…."
SECTION 2.3.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Irrigation Contractors'
Licensing Board shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.4.(a) North Carolina Auctioneers Commission. – G.S. 85B-4(e1) reads
as rewritten:
"(e1) The Commission may require licensees to complete annually not more than six hours
either (i) not more than three hours annually or (ii) not more than six hours biennially of
Commission-approved continuing education courses prior to license renewal. The Commission
shall determine which continuing education option shall be implemented and shall notify
licensees of the selected option no less than 90 days before the start of the applicable compliance
period. The Commission may impose different continuing education requirements, including no
such requirements, upon the classes of licensees under this Chapter. The Commission may waive
any or all continuing education requirements in cases of hardship, disability, or illness, or under
other circumstances as the Commission deems appropriate. The Commission may adopt rules
not inconsistent with the provisions of this Chapter to establish continuing education
requirements, including rules that govern any of the following:
(1) The content and subject matter of continuing education courses.
(2) The curriculum of required continuing education courses.
(3) The criteria, standards, and procedures for the approval of courses, course
sponsors, and course instructors.
(4) The methods of instruction for continuing education courses.
(5) The computation of course credit.
(6) The number of credit hours needed annually.for compliance.
(7) The ability to carry forward course credit from one year compliance period to
another.
(8) The waiver of the continuing education requirement for hardship or other
reasons to be determined by the Commission.
(9) The procedures for compliance and noncompliance with continuing education
requirements."
Page 4 Senate Bill 451-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.4.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Auctioneers Commission shall
adopt to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.5.(a) North Carolina Real Estate Commission. – G.S. 93A-38.5 reads
as rewritten:
"§ 93A-38.5. Continuing education.
(a) The Commission shall establish a program of continuing education for real estate
brokers. An individual licensed as a real estate broker is required to complete eight hours of
instruction a year during any license renewal period either (i) four hours of instruction a year
during any license renewal period or (ii) eight hours of instruction over a two-year period in
subjects the Commission deems appropriate. The Commission shall determine which continuing
education option shall be implemented and shall notify licensees of the selected option no less
than 90 days before the start of the applicable continuing education cycle. Any licensee who fails
to complete continuing education requirements pursuant to this section shall not actively engage
in the business of real estate broker.
(b) The Commission may, as part of the broker continuing education requirements,
require real estate brokers-in-charge to complete during each annual license period a special
continuing education course consisting of not more than four two hours of instruction if the
Commission selects the annual continuing education option, or not more than four hours of
instruction over a two-year period if the Commission selects the biennial continuing education
option, in subjects prescribed by the Commission.
…
(d) The Commission may adopt rules not inconsistent with this Chapter to implement the
continuing education requirement, including rules that govern:
…
(6) The ability to carry forward course credit from one year continuing education
cycle to another.
(7) The deferral of continuing education for brokers not engaged in brokerage.
(8) The waiver of or variance from the continuing education requirement for
hardship or other reasons.
(9) The procedures for compliance and sanctions for noncompliance.
…."
SECTION 2.5.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Real Estate Commission shall
adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.6.(a) North Carolina Alarm Systems Licensing Board. – G.S. 74D-5
reads as rewritten:
"§ 74D-5. Powers of the Board.
(a) In addition to the powers conferred upon the Board elsewhere in this Chapter, the
Board shall have the power to:
…
(9) Determine which of the following continuing education requirement options
shall apply. The Board shall select one of the following options and notify
licensees and registrants of the selected continuing education option no less
than 90 days before the start of the applicable continuing education cycle.
Credit shall be given only for classes that have been preapproved by the
Board:
a. Biennial requirement option. – Each licensee shall complete at least
three credit hours of continuing education training during each
two-year renewal period, and each registrant shall complete at least
one and one-half credit hours of continuing education training during
each two-year renewal period.
Senate Bill 451-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Quadrennial requirement option. – Each licensee shall complete at
least six credit hours of continuing education training during each
four-year period (spanning two renewal cycles), and each registrant
shall complete at least three credit hours of continuing education
training during each four-year period (spanning two renewal cycles).
(b) The chairman of the Board or his representative designated to be a hearing officer
may conduct any hearing called by the board for the purpose of denial, suspension, or revocation
of a license or registration under this Chapter."
SECTION 2.6.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Alarm Systems Licensing
Board shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.7.(a) North Carolina Board of Barber and Electrolysis Examiners. –
G.S. 86B-58 reads as rewritten:
"§ 86B-58. Continuing education.
(a) The Board shall determine the number of hours hours, subject to the requirements of
subsection (d) of this section, and subject matter of continuing education required as a condition
of license renewal. The Board may offer continuing education to the licensees under this act.
…
(d) Laser hair practitioners are required to complete a minimum of 10 hours of continuing
education annually to maintain their licenses pursuant to rules adopted by the Board.Continuing
education requirements for licensees shall be as follows:
(1) An electrologist licensed in this State shall complete continuing education
units in the amount determined by the Board pursuant to subsection (e) of this
section, which shall be either five continuing education units annually or 10
continuing education units biennially, as a requirement for renewal of the
electrology license.
(2) A laser hair practitioner licensed in this State shall complete continuing
education units in the amount determined by the Board pursuant to subsection
(e) of this section, which shall be either five continuing education units
annually or 10 continuing education units biennially, as a requirement for
renewal of the laser hair practitioner license.
(e) The Board shall determine whether continuing education requirements shall be
completed on an annual basis at five continuing education units per year or on a biennial basis at
10 continuing education units per two-year period. The Board shall notify licensees of the
selected continuing education cycle no less than 90 days before the start of the applicable
continuing education cycle. All references in this section to alternative continuing education
requirements shall be interpreted in accordance with the continuing education cycle established
by the Board pursuant to this subsection.
(f) Notwithstanding any other subsection of this section, the Board may establish,
through rule, reduced continuing education requirements for licensees with substantial practice
experience."
SECTION 2.7.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Board of Barber and
Electrolysis Examiners shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.8.(a) North Carolina Board of Cosmetic Art Examiners. – G.S. 88B-21
reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-21. Renewals; expired licenses; inactive status.
…
(d1) The Board shall determine which of the following continuing education requirement
options shall apply and shall notify licensees of the selected option no less than 90 days before
the start of the applicable continuing education cycle:
(1) Option 1. – Fewer hours requirement.
(2) Option 2. – Extended timeframe requirement.
Page 6 Senate Bill 451-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) Prior to renewal of a license, a teacher, cosmetologist, esthetician, natural hair care
specialist, or manicurist shall annually complete eight hours of Board-approved continuing
education for each year of the licensing cycle. A cosmetologist may complete up to 24 hours of
required continuing education at any time within the cosmetologist's three-year licensing cycle.If
the Board selects Option 1 under subsection (d1) of this section, prior to renewal of a license:
(1) A teacher, esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or manicurist shall annually
complete four hours of Board-approved continuing education.
(2) A cosmetologist shall complete a total of 12 hours of Board-approved
continuing education for the three-year licensing cycle and may complete
these hours at any time within the cosmetologist's three-year licensing cycle.
(e1) If the Board selects Option 2 under subsection (d1) of this section, prior to renewal of
a license:
(1) A teacher shall complete a total of eight hours of Board-approved continuing
education over a two-year licensing cycle.
(2) An esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or manicurist shall complete a total
of eight hours of Board-approved continuing education over a two-year
period, with a minimum of four hours completed each year.
(3) A cosmetologist shall complete a total of 24 hours of Board-approved
continuing education over a six-year period, with a minimum of four hours
completed each year.
(e2) Licensees shall submit written documentation to the Board showing that they have
satisfied the requirements of this subsection. subsection (e) or subsection (e1) of this section, as
applicable. A licensee who is in active practice as a cosmetologist, esthetician, natural hair care
specialist, or manicurist, has practiced for at least 10 consecutive years in that profession, and is
60 years of age or older does not have to meet the continuing education requirements of this
subsection. A licensee who is in active practice as a cosmetologist and has at least 20 consecutive
years of experience as a cosmetologist, does not have to meet the continuing education
requirements of this subsection, but shall report any continuing education classes completed to
the Board, whether the continuing education classes are Board-approved or not. Promotion of
products and systems shall be allowed at continuing education given in-house or at trade shows.
Continuing education classes may also be offered in secondary languages as needed. No member
of the Board may offer continuing education courses as required by this section.
…
(h) Upon request by a licensee for inactive status, the Board may place the licensee's
name on the inactive list so long as the licensee is in good standing with the Board. An inactive
licensee is not required to complete continuing education requirements. An inactive licensee shall
not practice cosmetic art for consideration. However, the inactive licensee may continue to
purchase supplies as accorded an active licensee. When the inactive licensee desires to be
removed from the inactive list and return to active practice, the inactive licensee shall notify the
Board of his or her desire to return to active status and pay the required fee as determined by the
Board. As a condition of returning to active status, the Board may require the licensee to complete
eight to 24 hours of continuing education pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.continuing
education consistent with the option selected under subsection (d1) of this section, as follows:
(1) If the Board has selected Option 1 under subsection (d1) of this section, the
Board may require four to 12 hours of continuing education.
(2) If the Board has selected Option 2 under subsection (d1) of this section, the
Board may require eight to 24 hours of continuing education to be completed
within the applicable time frame specified in subsection (e1) of this section."
SECTION 2.8.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Board of Cosmetic Art
Examiners shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of subsection (a) of this section.
Senate Bill 451-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.9.(a) North Carolina Board of Registration for Foresters. – G.S. 89B-11
reads as rewritten:
"§ 89B-11. Expiration and renewals; continuing education.
…
(b) The Board shall require registered foresters to attend continuing education courses
approved by the Board, not to exceed 12 hours per year, as a condition of renewal.While
maintaining the annual registration renewal cycle as established in subsection (a) of this section,
the Board shall determine which of the following continuing education requirement options shall
apply and shall require registered foresters to attend continuing education courses approved by
the Board as a condition of renewal:
(1) Option 1. – The continuing education requirement shall not exceed six hours
per annual registration period.
(2) Option 2. – The continuing education requirement shall not exceed 12 hours
over a two-year period, with compliance determined at the end of each
two-year continuing education cycle.
(c) The Board shall notify registered foresters of the selected continuing education option
provided by subsection (b) of this section no less than 90 days before the start of the applicable
continuing education cycle. Under either option, the registration shall continue to be renewed
annually as provided in subsection (a) of this section."
SECTION 2.9.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Board of Registration for
Foresters shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.10.(a) North Carolina State Board of Certified Public Accountant
Examiners. – G.S. 93-12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 93-12. Board of Certified Public Accountant Examiners.
The name of the State Board of Accountancy is hereby changed to State Board of Certified
Public Accountant Examiners and said name State Board of Certified Public Accountant
Examiners is hereby substituted for the name State Board of Accountancy wherever the latter
name appears or is used in Chapter 93 of the General Statutes. Said Board is created as an agency
of the State of North Carolina and shall consist of seven members to be appointed by the
Governor, five persons to be holders of valid and unrevoked certificates as certified public
accountants issued under the provisions of this Chapter and two persons who are not certified
public accountants who shall represent the interest of the public at large. Members of the Board
shall hold office for the term of three years and until their successors are appointed. Appointments
to the Board shall be made under the provisions of this Chapter as and when the terms of the
members of the present State Board of Accountancy expire; provided, that all future
appointments to said Board shall be made for a term of three years expiring on the thirtieth day
of June. All Board members serving on June 30, 1980, shall be eligible to complete their
respective terms. No member appointed to a term on or after July 1, 1980, shall serve more than
two complete consecutive terms. The powers and duties of the Board shall be as follows:
…
(8b) To formulate rules for the continuing professional education of all persons
holding the certificate of certified public accountant, subject to the following
provisions:
a. After January 1, 1983, any person desiring to obtain or renew a
certificate as a certified public accountant must offer evidence
satisfactory to the Board that the person has complied with the
continuing professional education requirement approved by the Board.
The Board may grant a conditional license for not more than 12
months for persons who are being licensed for the first time, or moving
into North Carolina, or for other good cause, in order that the person
may comply with the continuing professional education requirement.
Page 8 Senate Bill 451-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. The Board shall adopt rules for the administration of the continuing
professional education requirement with a minimum number of hours
of 20 and a maximum number of hours of 40 per year, and the The
Board shall determine which of the following continuing professional
education requirement options shall apply:
1. Option 1: Annual requirement. – The Board shall adopt rules
for the administration of the continuing professional education
requirement with a minimum number of hours of 10 and a
maximum number of hours of 20 per year; or
2. Option 2: Biennial requirement. – The Board shall adopt rules
for the administration of the continuing professional education
requirement with a minimum number of hours of 20 and a
maximum number of hours of 40 per two-year period.
The Board shall notify certificate holders of the selected continuing
professional education option no less than 90 days before the start of
the applicable continuing professional education cycle. The Board
may exempt persons who are retired or inactive from the continuing
professional education requirement. The Under either option, the
Board may also permit any certified public accountant to accumulate
hours of continuing professional education in any calendar year of as
much as two additional years annual requirement in advance of or
subsequent to the required calendar year.period.
c. Any applicant who offers satisfactory evidence on forms promulgated
by the Board that the applicant has participated in a continuing
professional education program of the type required by the Board shall
be deemed to have complied with this subdivision.
…."
SECTION 2.10.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina State Board of Certified
Public Accountant Examiners shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.11.(a) North Carolina State Board of Examiners of Electrical
Contractors. – G.S. 87-44.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-44.1. Continuing education courses required.
Beginning July 1, 1991, the Board may require as prerequisite to the annual renewal of a
license that every listed qualified individual complete continuing education courses in subjects
relating to electrical contracting to assure the safe and proper installation of electrical work and
equipment in order to protect the life, health, and property of the public. The listed qualified
individual shall complete, during the 12 months or 24 months, at the Board's choice, immediately
preceding license renewal, a specific number of hours of continuing education courses approved
by the Board prior to enrollment. The Board shall notify licensees of the selected continuing
education option no less than 90 days before the start of the applicable continuing education
cycle. The Board shall not require more than 10 five hours of continuing education courses per
12 months 12-month period, or more than 10 hours per 24-month period if the Board chooses a
biennial requirement, and such continuing education courses shall include those taught at a
community college as approved by the Board. The listed qualified individual may accumulate
and carry forward not more than two additional years of the annual fifty percent (50%) of the
required continuing education requirement. hours, not to exceed two and one-half hours for an
annual cycle or five hours for a biennial cycle, to the next applicable cycle. Attendance at any
course or courses of continuing education shall be certified to the Board on a form provided by
the Board and shall be submitted at the time the licensee makes application to the Board for its
license renewal and payment of its license renewal fee. This continuing education requirement
Senate Bill 451-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
may be waived by the Board in cases of certified illness or undue hardship as provided for in the
Rules of the Board."
SECTION 2.11.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina State Board of Examiners of
Electrical Contractors shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.12.(a) North Carolina Well Contractors Certification Commission. –
G.S. 87-98.12(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) In order to be certified under this Article, a well contractor shall satisfactorily
complete two hours one hour of approved continuing education each year for the first three years
of the contractor's certification. certification, or alternatively, at the Commission's choice, shall
complete a total of three hours of approved continuing education over the first six years of the
contractor's certification. The Commission shall notify contractors of the selected continuing
education option no less than 90 days before the start of the applicable continuing education cycle
and shall not require a well contractor properly certified in accordance with the provisions of this
Article and rules adopted under this Article to obtain continuing education credits for annual
renewal of certification after the contractor's third or sixth year of certification, depending on
which continuing education option the Board selects, except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section. The Commission shall specify the scope of required continuing education courses for
this purpose and shall approve continuing education courses."
SECTION 2.12.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Well Contractors
Certification Commission shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.13.(a) North Carolina Code Officials Qualification Board. –
G.S. 143-151.13A reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.13A. Professional development program for officials.
(a) As used in this section, "official" means a qualified Code-enforcement official as that
term is defined in G.S. 143-151.8.
(b) The Board may establish professional development requirements for officials as a
condition of the renewal or reactivation of their certificates. The purposes of these professional
development requirements are to assist officials in maintaining professional competence in their
enforcement of the Code and to assure the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of North
Carolina. An official subject to this section shall present evidence to the Board at each certificate
renewal after initial certification, that during the 12 months the official has completed the
required number of credit hours in courses approved by the Board during the applicable period
before the certificate expiration date, the official has completed the required number of credit
hours in courses approved by the Board. Annual continuing Continuing education hour
requirements shall be determined by the Board but shall not be more than six three credit hours.
hours per year, or alternatively, at the Board's choice, the Board may require up to six credit
hours to be completed over a two-year period. The Board shall notify officials of the selected
continuing education option no less than 90 days before the start of the applicable continuing
education cycle.
(c) The Board may require an individual who earns a certificate under programs
established in G.S. 143-151.13 to complete professional development courses, not to exceed six
three hours in each technical area of certification, within one year after that individual is first
employed by a city or county inspection department.
(d) As a condition of reactivating a standard or limited certificate, the Board may require
the completion of professional development courses within one year after reemployment as an
official as follows:
(1) An individual who has been on inactive status for more than two years and
who has not been continuously employed by a city or county inspection
department during the period of inactive status shall complete professional
development courses not to exceed six three hours for each technical area in
which the individual is certified.
Page 10 Senate Bill 451-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) An individual who has been on inactive status for more than two years and
who has been continuously employed by a city or county inspection
department during the period of inactive status shall complete professional
development courses not to exceed three one and one-half hours for each
technical area in which the individual is certified.
(3) An individual who has been on inactive status for two years or less shall
complete professional development courses not to exceed two hours one hour
for each technical area in which the individual is certified.
…."
SECTION 2.13.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Code Officials Qualification
Board shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.14.(a) North Carolina Home Inspector Licensure Board. –
G.S. 143-151.64 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.64. Continuing education requirements.
(a) Requirements. – The Board may establish programs of continuing education for
licensees under this Article. A licensee subject to a program under this section shall present
evidence to the Board upon the license renewal following initial licensure, and every renewal
thereafter, that during the 12 months applicable period preceding the annual license expiration
date the licensee has completed the required number of classroom hours of instruction in courses
approved by the Board. Annual continuing Continuing education hour requirements shall be
determined by the Board, but shall not be less than 12 six credit hours and no more than 20 hours.
10 credit hours annually, or alternatively, at the Board's choice, shall not be less than 12 credit
hours and no more than 20 credit hours over a two-year period. The Board shall notify licensees
of the selected continuing education option no less than 90 days before the start of the applicable
continuing education cycle. No member of the Board shall provide or sponsor a continuing
education course under this section while that person is serving on the Board.
…."
SECTION 2.14.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Home Inspector Licensure
Board shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.15.(a) North Carolina Manufactured Housing Board. –
G.S. 143-143.11B reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-143.11B. Continuing education.
(a) The Board may establish programs and requirements of continuing education for
licensees, but shall not require licensees to complete more than eight four credit hours of
continuing education. education annually, or alternatively, at the Board's choice, shall not require
licensees to complete more than eight credit hours of continuing education over a two-year
period. The Board shall notify licensees of the selected continuing education option no less than
90 days before the start of the applicable continuing education cycle. Before the renewal of a
license, a licensee shall present evidence to the Board that the licensee has completed the required
number of continuing education hours in courses approved by the Board during the two months
applicable period immediately preceding the expiration of the licensee's license. No member of
the Board shall provide or sponsor a continuing education course under this section while that
person is serving on the Board.
…
(c) The Board may adopt any reasonable rules not inconsistent with this Part to give
purpose and effect to the continuing education requirement, including rules that govern:
(1) The content and subject matter of continuing education courses.
(2) The criteria, standards, and procedures for the approval of courses, course
sponsors, and course instructors.
(3) The methods of instruction.
(4) The computation of course credit.
Senate Bill 451-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) The ability to carry forward course credit from one year to another.between
continuing education cycles.
(6) The waiver of or variance from the continuing education requirement for
hardship or other reasons.
(7) The procedures for compliance and sanctions for noncompliance.
…."
SECTION 2.15.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Manufactured Housing
Board shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.16.(a) The North Carolina Interpreter and Transliterator Licensing
Board. – G.S. 90D-8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90D-8. Provisional license.
(a) Upon application to the Board and the payment of the required fees, an applicant may
be issued a one-time provisional license as an interpreter or transliterator if the applicant meets
all of the following qualifications:
(1) Is at least 18 years of age.
(2) Is of good moral character as determined by the Board.
(3) Completes two one continuing education units unit approved by the Board.
These units must be completed Board for each renewable year.year, or
alternatively, at the Board's choice, completes two continuing education units
over a two-year period. The Board shall notify applicants of the selected
continuing education option no less than 90 days before the start of the
applicable continuing education cycle.
(4) Holds at least a two-year associate degree in interpreting from an accredited
institution and satisfies one of the following:
a. Holds a quality assurance North Carolina Interpreter Classification
System (NCICS) level C classification.
b. Holds a valid National Association of the Deaf (NAD) level 2 or 3
certification.
c. Holds a current Educational Interpreter Performance Assessment
(EIPA) level 3.5 or above classification.
d. Repealed by Session Laws 2005-299, s. 2, effective August 22, 2005.
e. Repealed by Session Laws 2023-137, s. 45(b), effective October 10,
2023.
f. Holds any other certificate or assessment issued by a nationally
recognized body approved by the Board by rule."
SECTION 2.16.(b) The North Carolina Interpreter and Transliterator Licensing
Board shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.

PART III. CARRYOVER OF EARNED HOURS
SECTION 3.1.(a) Carryover of Continuing Education Hours. – Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, each occupational licensing board subject to this act may adopt
or amend its rules to allow licensees to carry over continuing education or professional
development hours from one compliance window to the next, provided all of the following
conditions are met:
(1) Preservation of the fifty percent (50%) reduction. – Whether a board has
shortened the total hours per renewal cycle or extended the continuing
education or professional development hour compliance window (e.g., from
12 months to 24 months), any carryover policies shall not undermine the intent
of this act to reduce the effective continuing education and professional
development hour burden by fifty percent (50%) on an annualized basis.
Page 12 Senate Bill 451-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) No double counting. – Any hours used to satisfy a licensee's continuing
education or professional development hour requirement for one compliance
window or renewal cycle may not fully satisfy the requirement for a
subsequent compliance window or renewal cycle, unless the board's rules
clearly define allowable partial carryover or additional hours earned in excess
of the requirement.
(3) Uniform application. – Any hours earned prior to the effective date of this act
that are carried forward to a future compliance window shall be treated
uniformly for all licensees similarly situated. The board may set a maximum
limit on the number of hours carried over, how long those hours remain valid,
or whether partial hours (e.g., half-hour increments) are permissible.
SECTION 3.1.(b) Annual Renewal vs. Continuing Education Compliance Window.
– Nothing in this section requires a board to alter its statutory or regulatory license renewal
period. A board may maintain its current renewal cycle, whether it is annual or already longer
than one year, while granting licensees a compliance window sufficient to achieve a fifty percent
(50%) annualized reduction in the existing CE/PDH requirement mandated by this act.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.1. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
applications for and renewals of licensure, certification, and permits on or after that date.
Senate Bill 451-First Edition Page 13